Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-604.06
Nebraska Power Review Board; final action; appeal; manner.

An appeal of any final action of the Nebraska Power Review Board may be taken to the Court of Appeals. Such appeal shall be in accordance with the rules provided by law for appeals in civil cases.

Laws 1967, c. 418, § 12, p. 1291;

Laws 1981, LB 181, § 10;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 122;

Laws 2003, LB 187, § 12.